Washington statutes.
RCW 15.13.300

Nursery dealer licenses—Application—Contents.

Application for a license shall include:

(1) The full name of the person applying for the license and if the applicant is an individual, receiver, trustee, firm, partnership, association, or corporation, the full name of each member of the firm or partnership, or the names of the officers of the association or corporation.

(2) The principal business address of the applicant in the state and elsewhere.

(3) The address for the location or locations for which the licenses are being applied.

(4) The names of the persons authorized to receive and accept service of summons and legal notices of all kinds for the applicant.

(5) Any other necessary information prescribed by the director.

[ 2000 c 144 s 9; 1982 c 182 s 22; 1971 ex.s. c 33 s 6.]

NOTES:

Business license system generally: Chapter 19.02 RCW.